Florida, session 2026, SB752.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âPresent subsections (9), (10), and (11) of 16 section 201.02, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 17 subsections (10), (11), and (12), respectively, and a new 18 subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 19 201.02âTax on deeds and other instruments relating to real 20 property or interests in real property.â 21 (9)âTaxes imposed by this section do not apply to a deed, 22 transfer, or conveyance that transfers or conveys residential 23 property to a first-time homebuyer for use as a principal 24 residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term âfirst-time 25 homebuyerâ means a person who has not held ownership interest in 26 a principal residence during the 3-year period before the date 27 of purchase of the principal residence and who is a moderate 28 income person as defined in s. 420.602. 29 Section 2.âSubsection (10) is added to section 201.08, 30 Florida Statutes, to read: 31 201.08âTax on promissory or nonnegotiable notes, written 32 obligations to pay money, or assignments of wages or other 33 compensation; exception.â 34 (10)âTaxes imposed by this section do not apply to 35 documents described in subsection (1) that are executed by a 36 first-time homebuyer in connection with the purchase of a 37 principal residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term 38 âfirst-time homebuyerâ means a person who has not held ownership 39 interest in a principal residence during the 3-year period 40 before the date of purchase of the principal residence and who 41 is a moderate-income person as defined in s. 420.602. 42 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.